Utah statutes.
67-21-6.   Civil fine.

(1) (a)  A person who violates this chapter is liable for a civil fine of not more than $500.

(b)  The person who takes an adverse action against an employee in violation of this chapter, and not the public body that employs the employee, shall, after receiving notice and an opportunity to be heard, pay the civil fine under this Subsection (1).

(c)  If a person is ordered to pay a civil fine under this Subsection (1), the employer may dismiss the person who took the adverse action in violation of this chapter.

(2)  A civil fine ordered under this chapter shall be submitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the General Fund.

(3)  The civil fine described in this section may be imposed if a violation of this chapter is found by:

(a)  an independent personnel board described in Subsection 67-21-3.6(1)(a) or 67-21-3.7(1)(a);

(b)  the Career Service Review Office; or

(c)  a court.



Amended by Chapter 427, 2013 General Session

